Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB156.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 402.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Marriage is prohibited and void:
(a) With a person who has been adjudged mentally incompetent[disabled] by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(b) Where[ there is a husband or wife living, from whom] the person marrying
has not been divorced from a living spouse;
(c) When not solemnized or contracted in the presence of an authorized person or
society;
(d) Between members of the same sex;
(e) Between more than two (2) persons; and
(f) [Except as provided in KRS 402.210, ]With a person who at the time of
marriage is under eighteen (18) years of age.
(2) Subsection (1)(f) of this section shall not apply to a lawful marriage entered into in
the Commonwealth of Kentucky prior to the effective date of this Act[July 14,
2018], or to a lawful marriage in another state or country prior to the parties'
residence in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
Section 2. KRS 402.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Courts having general jurisdiction may declare void any marriage obtained by force
or fraud, or, if[provided that] the petition is brought by a party who was under the
age of majority as defined by KRS 2.015 at the time of marriage, a marriage
obtained by duress.
(2) Upon petition[At the instance] of any next friend, courts having general jurisdiction
may declare any marriage void where the person was under eighteen (18) years of
age at the time of the marriage[, and the marriage was without the consent required
by KRS 402.210].
Page 1 of 3
BR188900.100 - 1889 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1889
Section 3. KRS 402.080 is amended to read as follows:
No marriage shall be solemnized without a marriage license[ therefor]. The license[ shall
be issued by the clerk of the county in which the female resides at the time, unless the
female is eighteen (18) years of age or over or a widow, and the license is issued on her
application in person, in which case it] may be issued by any county clerk if the
requirements of Section 4 of this Act are met.
Section 4. KRS 402.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Both parties to a marriage shall:
(a) Be present for a marriage license to be issued; and
(b) Present to the county clerk documentary proof of age in the form of:
1. A copy of a birth record;
2. A certification of birth issued by the state department of health, a local
registrar of vital statistics, or other public office charged with similar
duties by the laws of another state, territory, or country;
3. A baptismal record showing the individual's date of birth;
4. A passport;
5. An automobile driver's license;
6. Any government or school issued identification card showing the
individual's date of birth;
7. An immigration record showing the individual's date of birth;
8. A naturalization record showing the individual's date of birth; or
9. A court record or any other document or record issued by a government
entity showing the individual's date of birth.
(2) If either of the parties is under eighteen (18)[seventeen (17)] years of age, no
license shall be issued.[
(3) If either of the parties is seventeen (17) years of age, a marriage license shall not be
issued unless:
Page 2 of 3
BR188900.100 - 1889 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1889
(a) The party who is seventeen (17) years of age presents to the clerk a certified
copy of a court order by a family court or District Court judge that grants the
party permission to marry and removes the party's disability of minority, as
provided in KRS 402.205; and
(b) At least fifteen (15) days have elapsed since the court order was granted.]
Section 5. The following KRS section is repealed:
402.205 Petition to court by seventeen year old for permission to marry -- Evidentiary
hearing -- Reasons for denying petition -- Effect of pregnancy -- Emancipation of
minor -- Other court-imposed condition -- Fee.
Page 3 of 3
BR188900.100 - 1889 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:39 PM Jacketed